Alaska statutes. Title 22. Judiciary.
Revisor’s notes. —

In 1966, under the authority of AS

01.05.031

and § 3, ch. 24, SLA 1966, “district court,” “district judge,” and “magistrate” were substituted for “district magistrate court,” “district magistrate,” and “deputy magistrate,” respectively, throughout the title. For a description of legislation further implementing § 3, ch. 24, SLA 1966, see 1971 House Journal, p. 52.

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1982 and 1988 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1982, 1988, 1998, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor word changes.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions related to the judiciary, see art. IV, Constitution of the State of Alaska.